Utah statutes.
58-22-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a professional engineer shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory evidence of good moral character;

(d) (i)  have graduated and received a bachelors or masters degree from an engineering program meeting criteria established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; or

(ii)  have completed the Transportation Engineering Technology and Fundamental Engineering College Program prior to July 1, 1998, under the direction of the Utah Department of Transportation and as certified by the Utah Department of Transportation;

(e)  have successfully completed a program of qualifying experience established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board;

(f)  have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(g)  meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualification for licensure.

(2)  Each applicant for licensure as a professional structural engineer shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory evidence of good moral character;

(d)  have graduated and received an earned bachelors or masters degree from an engineering program meeting criteria established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board;

(e)  have successfully completed three years of licensed professional engineering experience established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board, except that prior to January 1, 2009, an applicant for licensure may submit a signed affidavit in a form prescribed by the division stating that the applicant is currently engaged in the practice of structural engineering;

(f)  have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board, except that prior to January 1, 2009, an applicant for licensure may submit a signed affidavit in a form prescribed by the division stating that the applicant is currently engaged in the practice of structural engineering; and

(g)  meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualification for licensure.

(3)  Each applicant for licensure as a professional land surveyor shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory evidence of good moral character;

(d) (i)  have graduated and received an associates, bachelors, or masters degree from a land surveying program, or an equivalent land surveying program, such as a program offered by the Utah College of Applied Technology as approved by the State Board of Regents, established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board, and have successfully completed a program of qualifying experience in land surveying established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; or

(ii)  have successfully completed a program of qualifying experience in land surveying prior to January 1, 2007, in accordance with rules established by the division in collaboration with the board;

(e)  have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(f)  meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualification for licensure.

(4)  Each applicant for licensure by endorsement shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  provide satisfactory evidence of good moral character;

(d)  submit satisfactory evidence of:

(i)  current licensure in good standing in a jurisdiction recognized by rule by the division in collaboration with the board;

(ii)  having successfully passed an examination established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(iii)  full-time employment as a principal for at least five of the last seven years immediately preceding the date of the application as a:

(A)  licensed professional engineer for licensure as a professional engineer;

(B)  licensed professional structural engineer for licensure as a structural engineer; or

(C)  licensed professional land surveyor for licensure as a professional land surveyor; and

(e)  meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for license.

(5)  The rules made to implement this section shall be in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

